Washington statutes.
RCW 7.75.040

Dispute resolution agreement required—When admissible as evidence.

(1) In conducting a dispute resolution process, a center established under this chapter shall require:

(a) That the disputing parties enter into a written agreement which expresses the method by which they shall attempt to resolve the issues in dispute; and

(b) That at the conclusion of the dispute resolution process, the parties enter into a written agreement which sets forth the settlement of the issues and the future responsibilities, if any, of each party.

(2) A written agreement entered into with the assistance of a center at the conclusion of the written dispute resolution process is admissible as evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding.

[ 1984 c 258 s 504.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.